District of Columbia statutes.
2-561

Presumption created by publication.

The publication of any document in the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, or the District of Columbia Register creates a rebuttable presumption:

(1)

That it was duly issued, prescribed, adopted, or enacted; and

(2)

That all requirements of this subchapter have been complied with.

History

Oct. 21, 1968, Pub. L. 90-614, title III, § 311
as added Mar. 6, 1979, D.C. Law 2-153, § 4, 25 DCR 6960

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1541.
1973 Ed., § 1-1539.2.